Utah statutes.
62A-7-104.5.   Appropriation and funding of receiving centers.

Funding for receiving centers and youth services programs under this part is intended to be broad based, be provided by an appropriation by the Legislature to the division, and include federal grant money, local government money, and private donations.



Enacted by Chapter 452, 2013 General Session

